Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-719
Elective constitutional state officer; status; effect of bond; action to establish; notice and hearing; service.

Upon the filing of a petition, the Supreme Court shall by order fix the time for hearing thereon, which shall be not less than three days nor more than ten days from the filing of the petition. A copy of the order, certified by the clerk of the court, shall be served by the bailiff of the court, or other person appointed by the court for that purpose, upon the defendants in the manner provided for service of a summons in a civil action, not less than two days before said hearing, unless service is waived and voluntary appearance entered.

Laws 1935, c. 187, § 3, p. 693;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 84-729;

R.S.1943, § 84-719;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 101.